Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB314.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2789YC (1) 91 as/js H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 906.20 Medical release. 1 1. For purposes of this section: 2 a. âBoardâ means the board of parole. 3 b. âDepartmentâ means the department of corrections. 4 c. âIncapacitatedâ means a person who is physically or 5 mentally impaired to such a degree that the person is unable to 6 perform activities of daily living or requires skilled nursing, 7 hospice, or home health care. 8 d. âMedical releaseâ means the board-authorized release from 9 a facility under the control of the department of corrections 10 of a person committed to the custody of the director of the 11 department who has been diagnosed with a terminal illness, a 12 serious medical condition, or who is physically or mentally 13 incapacitated. 14 e. âSerious medical conditionâ means a disease with an 15 indeterminate prognosis but that is considered end-stage, or 16 the person is incapacitated. 17 f. âTerminal illnessâ means a disease or condition with a 18 prognosis of death within one year. 19 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 20 contrary, a person committed to the custody of the director of 21 the department may be eligible for medical release if either 22 of the following apply: 23 a. A licensed medical professional diagnoses the person with 24 a terminal illness with a prognosis of death within one year, 25 or a serious medical condition. 26 b. A licensed medical professional determines that the 27 person is physically or mentally incapacitated. 28 3. The department shall perform an updated risk assessment 29 on a person found to meet the requirements of subsection 2 that 30 evaluates the personâs risk of reoffending. 31 4. The department may identify a person eligible for medical 32 release and file a petition requesting a medical review by the 33 board. 34 5. A petition filed under subsection 4 shall include all of 35 -1- LSB 2789YC (1) 91 as/js 1/ 5 H.F. _____ the following: 1 a. Medical documentation of a diagnosis of a terminal 2 illness, a serious medical condition, or physical or mental 3 incapacitation. 4 b. A statement from a licensed medical professional 5 regarding the personâs diagnosis, prognosis, and required level 6 of care. 7 c. Any relevant information concerning the personâs behavior 8 and risk assessment. 9 6. Upon receipt of a petition filed under subsection 4, the 10 board shall do the following: 11 a. Review the petition and all submitted documentation. 12 b. Provide notice of the petition for medical review to 13 all victims of the person. The notice shall inform a victim, 14 as defined in section 915.10, of the right to submit a victim 15 impact statement to the board within fourteen days of receipt 16 of the notice. 17 7. a. All persons identified by the department for 18 potential medical release shall be interviewed by the board. 19 b. If the personâs condition is such that the person 20 is unable to meaningfully participate in an interview, the 21 personâs case manager or other representative of the department 22 shall be present and shall answer board questions related to 23 the personâs medical condition. 24 8. The board shall make a decision within forty-five days 25 of receiving the petition. The decision shall be based on all 26 of the following: 27 a. The medical condition and prognosis of the person. 28 b. The nature of the offense committed by the person. 29 c. The risk assessment. 30 d. Any other factors the board considers when making a 31 parole release decision. 32 9. All hearings on petitions for medical release are open 33 to the public. 34 10. If the petition is approved by the board, the person 35 -2- LSB 2789YC (1) 91 as/js 2/ 5 H.F. _____ shall be released to a suitable care facility or home setting, 1 provided that appropriate supervision and support are 2 available. 3 11. A released person shall be supervised under a release 4 plan that includes the following: 5 a. Medical care and support services. 6 b. Regular check-ins with a designated supervisory officer. 7 c. Any other conditions deemed necessary for the well-being 8 of the person and to ensure public safety. 9 12. a. The board shall maintain the records of all 10 petitions and decisions regarding medical release. 11 b. The board shall submit an annual report by December 12 15, 2026, and each year thereafter, to the general assembly 13 detailing the number of petitions received in the previous 14 twelve-month period, the number of persons released, and the 15 outcomes and status of the released persons. 16